Arkansas, session 2025, HB1004.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 77, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
20-77-154. Extension of one year for postpartum coverage.
(a) The Department of Human Services shall:
(1)(A) Extend postpartum Medicaid coverage for mothers to one
(1) year in duration.
(B) If a mother is eligible to be enrolled under the
Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Act of 2021, § 23-61-1001 et seq., the
extended postpartum Medicaid coverage shall be delivered as provided under
the Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Act of 2021,§ 23-61-1001 et seq.
(C) If a mother is not eligible to be enrolled under the
Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Act of 2021, § 23-61-1001 et seq., the
extended postpartum Medicaid coverage shall be delivered through the
traditional Arkansas Medicaid Program;
(2) Take necessary action, including without limitation
submitting and applying for a state plan amendment or waiver, to obtain
*JMB090*
03-31-2025 12:23:19 JMB090

As Engrossed: H3/31/25 HB1004
federal approval to adopt one-year postpartum Medicaid coverage for a mother
who has recently given birth; and
(3) Request the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services to use
Children's Health Insurance Program funding to extend postpartum Medicaid
coverage for mothers as described in subdivision (a)(1) of this section
through a health services initiative project.
(b) The department shall promulgate rules to administer this section.

/s/Pilkington



























03-31-2025 12:23:19 JMB090